apertium-pl-sk.sk.dix
    <pardef n="n/áš__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áš</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áš</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aša</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ášho</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ášho</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašej</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ášho</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ášmu</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ášmu</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašej</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ášmu</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ášho</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áš</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašu</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aším</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aším</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašou</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aším</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašom</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašom</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašej</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašom</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áš</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áš</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aša</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Plurals -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aši</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašim</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašim</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašim</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašim</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašimi</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašimi</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašimi</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašimi</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ašich</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aši</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>
          <r>áš<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aše</l>

    <e lm="náš"><i>n</i><par n="n/áš__det"/></e>
    <e lm="váš"><i>v</i><par n="n/áš__det"/></e>
